Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.030

Required action districts—Recommendation for designation—Reconsideration—Designation—Notice.

(1) Beginning in January 2011, the superintendent of public instruction shall annually recommend to the state board of education school districts for designation as required action districts. A district with at least one school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school according to the criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.657.020 shall be designated as a required action district. However, a school district shall not be recommended for designation as a required action district if the district was awarded a federal school improvement grant by the superintendent in 2010 or 2011 and for three consecutive years following receipt of the grant implemented a federal school intervention model at each school identified for improvement. The state board of education may designate a district that received a school improvement grant in 2010 or 2011 as a required action district if after three years of voluntarily implementing a plan the district continues to have a school identified as persistently lowest-achieving and meets the criteria for designation established by the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school district superintendent with written notice of the recommendation for designation as a required action district by certified mail or personal service. A school district superintendent may request reconsideration of the superintendent of public instruction's recommendation. The reconsideration shall be limited to a determination of whether the school district met the criteria for being recommended as a required action district. A request for reconsideration must be in writing and served on the superintendent of public instruction within ten days of service of the notice of the superintendent's recommendation.

(3) The state board of education shall annually designate those districts recommended by the superintendent in subsection (1) of this section as required action districts. A district designated as a required action district shall be required to notify all parents of students attending a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school in the district of the state board of education's designation of the district as a required action district and the process for complying with the requirements set forth in RCW 28A.657.040 through 28A.657.100.

[ 2013 c 159 s 4; 2010 c 235 s 103.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.